Utah statutes.
30-3-11.2.   Appointment of counsel for child.

If, in any action before any court of this state involving the custody or support of a child, it shall appear in the best interests of the child to have a separate exposition of the issues and personal representation for the child, the court may appoint counsel to represent the child throughout the action, and the attorney's fee for such representation may be taxed as a cost of the action.

